District of Columbia statutes.
48-902.05

Schedule II tests.

The Mayor shall place a substance in Schedule II if the Mayor finds that:

(1)

The substance has high potential for abuse;

(2)

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States or the District of Columbia, or currently accepted medical use, with severe restrictions; and

(3)

The abuse of the substance may lead to severe psychological or physical dependence.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 205, 28 DCR 3081

History

1981 Ed., § 33-515.

Prior Codifications